Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1436XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1436XD (4) 91
th/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 468.43, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. When any public highway or other public land extends
into or through a levee or drainage district, the commissioners
to assess benefits shall ascertain and return in their report
the amount of benefits and the apportionment of costs and
expenses to such highway or other public land, and the board
of supervisors shall assess the same against such highway
and land. The apportionment of costs and expenses assessed
against a highway or other public land shall not exceed the
total assessment value multiplied by the quotient of the area
of the highway or other public land within a levee or drainage
district divided by the total area of all land, including the
highway or other public land, in such district.